Utah statutes.
72-9-103.   Rulemaking -- Adjudicative proceedings.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department shall make rules:
(a)  adopting by reference in whole or in part the Federal Motor Carrier
Safety Regulations including minimum security requirements for motor carriers;
(b)  specifying the equipment required to be carried in each tow truck,
including limits on loads that may be moved based on equipment capacity and
load weight;
(c)  specifying collection procedures, in conjunction with the administration
and enforcement of the safety or security requirements, for the motor carrier
fee under Section 72-9-706; and
(d)  providing for the necessary administration and enforcement of this
chapter.
(2)  The department shall comply with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative
Procedures Act, in its adjudicative proceedings.
